Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.750

Retirement or termination agreement payments—Overpayments not required to be repaid.

(1) Retirees whose reported earnable compensation included payments made pursuant to an agreement to terminate or retire, or to provide notice of intent to retire, shall not be required to repay to the trust funds any overpayments resulting from the employer misreporting, subject to the conditions provided in subsection (2) of this section. The retirees' allowances shall be prospectively adjusted to reflect the benefits to which the retirees are correctly entitled.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall apply only to members of the teachers' retirement system who retired prior to January 1, 1993, from service with a community college district.

(3) Any retirees under subsection (2) of this section who, since January 1, 1990, have had their retirement allowances reduced under RCW 41.50.130(1)(b) because of the inclusion of retirement agreement payments in calculating their allowances, shall have their allowances adjusted to reflect the benefits to which the retirees are correctly entitled, but without a reduction to recoup prior overpayments. The retirees shall be reimbursed by the retirement system for the cumulative amount of the reduction in the retirement allowance that has occurred since January 1, 1990, to recoup prior overpayments.

(4) Any retirees covered by subsection (2) of this section who, after January 1, 1990, repaid a previous overpayment in a lump sum under RCW 41.50.130(1)(b) because of the inclusion of retirement agreement payments in calculating their allowances, shall be reimbursed by the retirement system for the amount of the lump sum repayment.

[ 1993 c 270 s 3.]